Illinois, session 104th, HB2925.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Whistleblower Act is amended by changing 5Sections 15, 20, and 30 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 174/15)7    Sec. 15. Retaliation for certain disclosures prohibited. 8    (a) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 9employee who discloses or threatens to disclose to a public 10body conducting an investigation, or in a court, an 11administrative hearing, or any other proceeding initiated by a 12public body, information related to a past, current, or future 13an activity, policy, or practice of the employer or a third 14party, where the employee has a good faith belief that the 15activity, policy, or practice (i) violates a municipal, 16county, State, or federal law, rule, or regulation or (ii) 17poses a substantial and specific danger to employees, public 18health, or safety.19    (b) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 20employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose information 21to a government or law enforcement agency, whether that agency 22is the employer or a third party, information related to an 23activity, policy, or practice of the employer, where the   HB2925- 2 -LRB104 10445 JRC 20520 b1employee has a good faith belief that the activity, policy, or 2practice of the employer or third party (i) violates a 3municipal, county, State, or federal law, rule, or regulation 4or (ii) poses a substantial and specific danger to employees, 5public health, or safety.6    (c) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 7employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose to any 8supervisor, principal officer, board member, or supervisor in 9an organization that has a contractual relationship with the 10employer who makes the employer aware of the disclosure, 11information related to an activity, policy, or practice of the 12employer if the employee has a good faith belief that the 13activity, policy, or practice (i) violates a municipal, 14county, State, or federal law, rule, or regulation or (ii) 15poses a substantial and specific danger to employees, public 16health, or safety. 17(Source: P.A. 103-867, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-21-24.) 18    (740 ILCS 174/20)19    Sec. 20. Retaliation for certain refusals prohibited. An 20employer may not take retaliatory action against an employee 21for refusing to participate in a past, current, or future an 22activity when that the employee has a good faith belief that 23such participation would result in a violation of a municipal, 24county, State, or federal law, rule, or regulation, including, 25but not limited to, violations of the Freedom of Information   HB2925- 3 -LRB104 10445 JRC 20520 b1Act.2(Source: P.A. 103-867, eff. 1-1-25.) 3    (740 ILCS 174/30)4    Sec. 30. Damages and penalties for the employee. If an 5employer takes any retaliatory action against an employee in 6violation of Section 15, or 20, or 20.1, the employee may bring 7a civil action against the employer for all relief necessary 8to make the employee whole, including but not limited to the 9following, as appropriate:10        (1) permanent or preliminary injunctive relief;11        (2) reinstatement with the same seniority status that 12    the employee would have had, but for the violation;13        (3) back pay, with interest of 9% per annum up to 90 14    calendar days from the date the complaint is filed and 15    front pay;16        (4) liquidated damages of up to $10,000; 17        (5) compensatory damages; 18        (6) compensation for any costs incurred as a result of 19    the violation, including litigation costs, expert witness 20    fees, and reasonable attorney's fees; and21        (7) (6) additionally, the court shall award a civil 22    penalty of $10,000 payable to the employee.23(Source: P.A. 103-867, eff. 1-1-25.)